District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.12

Content of an application to amend an Underground Infrastructure Improvement Projects Plan.

An application to the Commission by the electric company or DDOT to amend an existing Underground Infrastructure Improvement Projects Plan, approved by the Commission pursuant to § 34-1313.10, shall describe the purpose to be accomplished by the proposed amendment, the financial impacts, if any, to the electric company’s customers that are likely to result from the amendment, if approved, and include each item set forth in § 34-1313.08; provided, that for good cause shown in its application, the electric company may omit the material required in one more of the items listed in § 34-1313.08.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 312, 61 DCR 1882